Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 9. Virginia Antiquities Act.

§§ 10.1-900 through 10.1-906.

Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 656.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to the Virginia Antiquities Act, see Chapter 23 of Title 10.1. For new chapters relating to historic resources and historic preservation, see Chapters 22 and 24.1 of Title 10.1.

Editor’s note.

Repealed Chapter 9 of Title 10.1, the Virginia Antiquities Act, was enacted as part of Title 10.1 by Acts 1988, c. 891.